Hawaii statutes.
§662-6 Pleadings, trial and appeal. [(a)]
The Hawaii rules of civil procedure and the district court rules of civil
procedure as applicable shall be followed in any action under this chapter. A
certified copy of all pleadings shall be duly served on the attorney general.

[(b)] Sections 661-2 and 661-9 shall apply to
actions under this chapter. [L 1957, c 312, pt of §1; Supp, §245A-6; HRS
§662-6; am L 1972, c 164, §2(b); am L 1978, c 156, §3]

Note

Section 661-9 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next